Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-314
Person, defined.

Person shall include one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships, limited liability companies, associations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies, joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, and fiduciaries.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 15;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 147.